Hawaii statutes.
§486-119 Hawaii-made products;
Hawaii-processed products. (a) No person shall keep, offer, display or
expose for sale, or solicit for the sale of any item, product, souvenir, or any
other merchandise that is labeled "made in Hawaii" or that by any
other means misrepresents the origin of the item as being from any place within
the State, or uses the phrase "made in Hawaii" as an advertising or
media tool for any craft item that has not been manufactured, assembled,
fabricated, or produced within the State and that has not had at least
fifty-one per cent of its wholesale value added by manufacture, assembly,
fabrication, or production within the State.

(b) Subsection (a) notwithstanding, no person
shall keep, offer, display, expose for sale, or solicit the sale of any
perishable consumer commodity that is labeled "made in Hawaii",
"produced in Hawaii", or "processed in Hawaii" or that by
any other means represents the origin of the perishable consumer commodity as
being from any place within the State, or use the phrase "made in
Hawaii", "produced in Hawaii", or "processed in
Hawaii" as an advertising or media tool for any perishable consumer
commodity, unless the perishable consumer commodity is wholly or partially
manufactured, processed, or produced within the State from raw materials that
originate from inside or outside the State and at least fifty-one per cent of
the wholesale value of the perishable consumer commodity is added by
manufacture, processing, or production within the State. [L 1991, c 153, pt of
§6; am L 2009, c 80, §2]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next